Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 55. Sentencing and Probation.
Sec. 12.55.155.
Factors in aggravation and mitigation.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, if a defendant is convicted of an offense and is subject to sentencing under AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d), (e), or (i) and

the low end of the presumptive range is four years or less, the court may impose any sentence below the presumptive range for factors in mitigation or may increase the active term of imprisonment up to the maximum term of imprisonment for factors in aggravation;

the low end of the presumptive range is more than four years, the court may impose a sentence below the presumptive range as long as the active term of imprisonment is not less than 50 percent of the low end of the presumptive range for factors in mitigation or may increase the active term of imprisonment up to the maximum term of imprisonment for factors in aggravation.

Sentences under this section that are outside of the presumptive ranges set out in AS

12.55.125

shall be based on the totality of the aggravating and mitigating factors set out in (c) and (d) of this section.

The following factors shall be considered by the sentencing court if proven in accordance with this section, and may allow imposition of a sentence above the presumptive range set out in AS

12.55.125

:

a person, other than an accomplice, sustained physical injury as a direct result of the defendant’s conduct;

the defendant’s conduct during the commission of the offense manifested deliberate cruelty to another person;

the defendant was the leader of a group of three or more persons who participated in the offense;

the defendant employed a dangerous instrument in furtherance of the offense;

the defendant knew or reasonably should have known that the victim of the offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to advanced age, disability, ill health, homelessness, consumption of alcohol or drugs, or extreme youth or was for any other reason substantially incapable of exercising normal physical or mental powers of resistance;

the defendant’s conduct created a risk of imminent physical injury to three or more persons, other than accomplices;

a prior felony conviction considered for the purpose of invoking a presumptive range under this chapter was of a more serious class of offense than the present offense;

the defendant’s prior criminal history includes conduct involving aggravated assaultive behavior, repeated instances of assaultive behavior, repeated instances of cruelty to animals proscribed under AS

11.61.140(a)(1)

and (3) — (5), or a combination of assaultive behavior and cruelty to animals proscribed under AS

11.61.140(a)(1)

and (3) — (5); in this paragraph, “aggravated assaultive behavior” means assault that is a felony under AS 11.41, or a similar provision in another jurisdiction;

the defendant knew that the offense involved more than one victim;

the conduct constituting the offense was among the most serious conduct included in the definition of the offense;

the defendant committed the offense under an agreement that the defendant either pay or be paid for the commission of the offense, and the pecuniary incentive was beyond that inherent in the offense itself;

the defendant was on release under AS 12.30 for another felony charge or conviction or for a misdemeanor charge or conviction having assault as a necessary element;

the defendant knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at an active officer of the court or at an active or former judicial officer, prosecuting attorney, law enforcement officer, correctional employee, firefighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic, ambulance attendant, or other emergency responder during or because of the exercise of official duties;

the defendant was a member of an organized group of five or more persons, and the offense was committed to further the criminal objectives of the group;

the defendant has three or more prior felony convictions;

the defendant’s criminal conduct was designed to obtain substantial pecuniary gain and the risk of prosecution and punishment for the conduct is slight;

the offense was one of a continuing series of criminal offenses committed in furtherance of illegal business activities from which the defendant derives a major portion of the defendant’s income;

the offense was a felony

specified in AS 11.41 and was committed against a spouse, a former spouse, or a member of the social unit made up of those living together in the same dwelling as the defendant;

specified in AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.458

and the defendant has engaged in the same or other conduct prohibited by a provision of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

involving the same or another victim;

specified in AS 11.41 that is a crime involving domestic violence and was committed in the physical presence or hearing of a child under 16 years of age who was, at the time of the offense, living within the residence of the victim, the residence of the perpetrator, or the residence where the crime involving domestic violence occurred;

specified in AS 11.41 and was committed against a person with whom the defendant has a dating relationship or with whom the defendant has engaged in a sexual relationship; or

specified in AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.458

or AS

11.61.128

and the defendant was 10 or more years older than the victim;

the defendant’s prior criminal history includes an adjudication as a delinquent for conduct that would have been a felony if committed by an adult;

the defendant was on furlough under AS 33.30 or on parole or probation for another felony charge or conviction that would be considered a prior felony conviction under AS

12.55.145(a)(1)(B)

;

the defendant has a criminal history of repeated instances of conduct violative of criminal laws, whether punishable as felonies or misdemeanors, similar in nature to the offense for which the defendant is being sentenced under this section;

the defendant knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at a victim because of that person’s race, sex, color, creed, physical or mental disability, ancestry, or national origin;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and

the offense involved the delivery of a controlled substance under circumstances manifesting an intent to distribute the substance as part of a commercial enterprise; or

at the time of the conduct resulting in the conviction, the defendant was caring for or assisting in the care of a child under 10 years of age;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and the offense involved the transportation of controlled substances into the state;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and the offense involved large quantities of a controlled substance;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and the offense involved the distribution of a controlled substance that had been adulterated with a toxic substance;

the defendant, being 18 years of age or older,

is legally accountable under AS

11.16.110

(2) for the conduct of a person who, at the time the offense was committed, was under 18 years of age and at least three years younger than the defendant; or

is aided or abetted in planning or committing the offense by a person who, at the time the offense was committed, was under 18 years of age and at least three years younger than the defendant;

the victim of the offense is a person who provided testimony or evidence related to a prior offense committed by the defendant;

the defendant committed the offense for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.41.410 —

11.41.455

, and the defendant knowingly supplied alcohol or a controlled substance to the victim in furtherance of the offense with the intent to make the victim incapacitated; in this paragraph, “incapacitated” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.470

;

the defendant’s prior criminal history includes convictions for five or more crimes in this or another jurisdiction that are class A misdemeanors under the law of this state, or having elements similar to a class A misdemeanor; two or more convictions arising out of a single continuous episode are considered a single conviction; however, an offense is not a part of a continuous episode if committed while attempting to escape or resist arrest or if it is an assault on a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer or correctional employee; notice and denial of convictions are governed by AS

12.55.145(b)

— (d);

the offense is a violation of AS 11.41 or AS

11.46.400

and the offense occurred on school grounds, on a school bus, at a school-sponsored event, or in the administrative offices of a school district if students are educated at that office; in this paragraph,

“school bus” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

;

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

47.07.063

;

“school grounds” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

;

the offense was a felony specified in AS 11.41.410 —

11.41.455

, the defendant had been previously diagnosed as having or having tested positive for HIV or AIDS, and the offense either (A) involved penetration, or (B) exposed the victim to a risk or a fear that the offense could result in the transmission of HIV or AIDS; in this paragraph, “HIV” and “AIDS” have the meanings given in AS

18.15.310

;

the defendant committed the offense on, or to affect persons or property on, the premises of a recognized shelter or facility providing services to victims of domestic violence or sexual assault;

the defendant knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at a victim because that person was 65 years of age or older;

the defendant committed the offense at a health care facility and knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at a medical professional during or because of the medical professional’s exercise of professional duties; in this paragraph,

“health care facility” has the meaning given in AS

18.07.111

;

“medical professional” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.135(k)

;

the defendant knowingly caused the victim to become unconscious by means of a dangerous instrument; in this paragraph, “dangerous instrument” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)(15)(B)

.

The following factors shall be considered by the sentencing court if proven in accordance with this section, and may allow imposition of a sentence below the presumptive range set out in AS

12.55.125

:

the offense was principally accomplished by another person, and the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of the victim;

the defendant, although an accomplice, played only a minor role in the commission of the offense;

the defendant committed the offense under some degree of duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense, but that significantly affected the defendant’s conduct;

the conduct of a youthful defendant was substantially influenced by another person more mature than the defendant;

the conduct of an aged defendant was substantially a product of physical or mental infirmities resulting from the defendant’s age;

in a conviction for assault under AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.220

, the defendant acted with serious provocation from the victim;

except in the case of a crime defined by AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

, the victim provoked the crime to a significant degree;

before the defendant knew that the criminal conduct had been discovered, the defendant fully compensated or made a good faith effort to fully compensate the victim of the defendant’s criminal conduct for any damage or injury sustained;

the conduct constituting the offense was among the least serious conduct included in the definition of the offense;

the defendant was motivated to commit the offense solely by an overwhelming compulsion to provide for emergency necessities for the defendant’s immediate family;

after commission of the offense for which the defendant is being sentenced, the defendant assisted authorities to detect, apprehend, or prosecute other persons who committed an offense;

the facts surrounding the commission of the offense and any previous offenses by the defendant establish that the harm caused by the defendant’s conduct is consistently minor and inconsistent with the imposition of a substantial period of imprisonment;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and the offense involved small quantities of a controlled substance;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and the offense involved the distribution of a controlled substance, other than a schedule IA controlled substance, to a personal acquaintance who is 19 years of age or older for no profit;

the defendant is convicted of an offense specified in AS 11.71 and the offense involved the possession of a small amount of a controlled substance for personal use in the defendant’s home;

in a conviction for assault or attempted assault or for homicide or attempted homicide, the defendant acted in response to domestic violence perpetrated by the victim against the defendant and the domestic violence consisted of aggravated or repeated instances of assaultive behavior;

except in the case of an offense defined by AS 11.41 or AS

11.46.400

, the defendant has been convicted of a class B or C felony, and, at the time of sentencing, has successfully completed a court-ordered treatment program as defined in AS

28.35.028

that was begun after the offense was committed;

except in the case of an offense defined under AS 11.41 or AS

11.46.400

or a defendant who has previously been convicted of a felony, the defendant committed the offense while suffering from a mental disease or defect as defined in AS

12.47.130

that was insufficient to constitute a complete defense but that significantly affected the defendant’s conduct;

the defendant is convicted of an offense under AS 11.71, and the defendant sought medical assistance for another person who was experiencing a drug overdose contemporaneously with the commission of the offense;

except in the case of an offense defined under AS 11.41 or AS 11.46.400, the defendant committed the offense while suffering from a condition diagnosed

as a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder, the fetal alcohol spectrum disorder substantially impaired the defendant’s judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life, and the fetal alcohol spectrum disorder, though insufficient to constitute a complete defense, significantly affected the defendant’s conduct; in this subparagraph, “fetal alcohol spectrum disorder” means a condition of impaired brain function in the range of permanent birth defects caused by maternal consumption of alcohol during pregnancy; or

as combat-related post-traumatic stress disorder or combat-related traumatic brain injury, the combat-related post-traumatic stress disorder or combat-related traumatic brain injury substantially impaired the defendant’s judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life, and the combat-related post-traumatic stress disorder or combat-related traumatic brain injury, though insufficient to constitute a complete defense, significantly affected the defendant’s conduct; in this subparagraph, “combat-related post-traumatic stress disorder or combat-related traumatic brain injury” means post-traumatic stress disorder or traumatic brain injury resulting from combat with an enemy of the United States in the line of duty while on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States; nothing in this subparagraph is intended to limit the application of (18) of this subsection;

the defendant, as a condition of release ordered by the court, successfully completed an alcohol and substance abuse monitoring program established under AS

47.38.020

.

If a factor in aggravation is a necessary element of the present offense, or requires the imposition of a sentence within the presumptive range under AS

12.55.125(c)(2)

, that factor may not be used to impose a sentence above the high end of the presumptive range. If a factor in mitigation is raised at trial as a defense reducing the offense charged to a lesser included offense, that factor may not be used to impose a sentence below the low end of the presumptive range.

If the state seeks to establish a factor in aggravation at sentencing

under (c)(7), (8), (12), (15), (18)(B), (19), (20), (21), or (31) of this section, or if the defendant seeks to establish a factor in mitigation at sentencing, written notice must be served on the opposing party and filed with the court not later than 10 days before the date set for imposition of sentence; the factors in aggravation listed in this paragraph and factors in mitigation must be established by clear and convincing evidence before the court sitting without a jury; all findings must be set out with specificity;

other than one listed in (1) of this subsection, the factor shall be presented to a trial jury under procedures set by the court, unless the defendant waives trial by jury, stipulates to the existence of the factor, or consents to have the factor proven under procedures set out in (1) of this subsection; a factor in aggravation presented to a jury is established if proved beyond a reasonable doubt; written notice of the intent to establish a factor in aggravation must be served on the defendant and filed with the court

20 days before trial, or at another time specified by the court;

within 48 hours, or at a time specified by the court, if the court instructs the jury about the option to return a verdict for a lesser included offense; or

five days before entering a plea that results in a finding of guilt, or at another time specified by the court.

Voluntary alcohol or other drug intoxication or chronic alcoholism or other drug addiction may not be considered an aggravating or mitigating factor.

If one of the aggravating factors in (c) of this section is established as provided in (f)(1) and (2) of this section, the court may increase the term of imprisonment up to the maximum term of imprisonment. Any additional aggravating factor may then be established by clear and convincing evidence by the court sitting without a jury, including an aggravating factor that the jury has found not to have been established beyond a reasonable doubt.

In this section, “serious provocation” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.115(f)

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 39 — 41 ch 102 SLA 1980; am §§ 19, 20 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 36, 38, 39, 42 ch 143 SLA 1982; am §§ 6, 7 ch 92 SLA 1983; am § 19 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1987; am § 7 ch 66 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 64 SLA 1991; am § 26 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 7 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 60 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 90 SLA 2003; am §§ 16 — 21 ch 2 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 66 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2008; am §§ 23, 24 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2008; am §§ 15, 16 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 19 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 79 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2012; am § 13 ch 70 SLA 2012; am § 5 ch 71 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 2014; am § 25 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 20 SLA 2015; am § 17 ch 22 SLA 2018; am § 8 ch 11 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Sentences of imprisonment for felonies — AS

12.55.125

Extraordinary circumstances — AS

12.55.165

Three-judge sentencing panel — AS

12.55.175

Definition of “physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” —AS

11.81.900(b)

Intoxication as a defense — AS

11.81.630

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (23)-(26) of subsection (c) were enacted as (19)-(22).
Renumbered in 1982.

Paragraph (c)(32) was enacted as (c)(31); renumbered in 2005.

In 2007, (d)(8) of this section was renumbered as (d)(9) and (d)(9) was renumbered as (d)(8).

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i), and relettered in 2012.

Cross references. —

For considerations in imposing sentence, see AS

12.55.005

and note to AS

12.55.120

.

For effect of subsection (h) on Rule 32.1, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 16, ch. 70, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of (c)(36), see sec. 30(c), ch. 22, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (c)(5), added “consumption of alcohol or drugs,” following “ill health, homelessness,”, in (c)(18), added (D) and (E), and made a stylistic change.

The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (c)(12), substituted “AS 12.30” for “AS

12.30.020

or

12.30.040

”.

The third 2010 amendment, effective September 13, 2010, in (c)(8), added “, repeated instances of cruelty to animals proscribed under AS

11.61.140(a)(1)

and (3) — (5), or a combination of assaultive behavior and cruelty to animals proscribed under AS

11.61.140(a)(1)

and (3) — (5)” following “repeated instances of assaultive behavior”, and made related changes.

The first 2012 amendment, effective September 19, 2012, added (d)(20), and made a related stylistic change.

The second 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (i) [now (h)].

The third 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (c)(35).

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (c)(31), substituted “an assault on a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer or correctional employee” for “an assault upon a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (d)(20)(B), and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment, effective August 12, 2015, added (d)(21).

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, added (c)(36), and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, added (c)(37), and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendment of paragraph (c)(5) and the enactment of subparagraphs (c)(18)(D) and (E) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Sec. 6, ch. 79, SLA 2010, provides that the changes to the aggravating factors under (c)(8) of this section made by sec. 5, ch. 79, SLA 2010, “apply to offenses occurring on or after September 13, 2010.”

In 2011, in subdivision (f)(2), “waives trial” was substituted for “waives trail” to correct a manifest error in ch. 2, SLA 2005.

Section 49, ch. 71, SLA 2012 provides that paragraph (c)(35) applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.”

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 5, ch. 56, SLA 2014, the changes to subsection (c) made in sec. 2, ch. 56, SLA 2014 apply “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2014.”

Paragraph (d)(20), as amended by sec. 25, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies “to prosecutions occurring on or after July 17, 2014 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014.”

Under sec. 5(b), ch. 20, SLA 2015, paragraph (d)(21) “applies to a sentence imposed on or after August 12, 2015 for an offense committed before, on, or after August 12, 2015.”

Section 11,
ch. 11, SLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (c) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after October 17, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980 or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

For House letter of intent on ch. 66, SLA 1988 (CSHB 237 (Jud)), which amended this section, see 1988 House Journal 2330 — 2337.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 66, SLA 2005 (HB 88), relating to offenses occurring at schools, see 2005 House Journal 105 — 106.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the amendments of (c)(5) and (18) of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Sec. 12.55.165.
Extraordinary circumstances.

If the defendant is subject to sentencing under AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d), (e), or (i) and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that manifest injustice would result from failure to consider relevant aggravating or mitigating factors not specifically included in AS

12.55.155

or from imposition of a sentence within the presumptive range, whether or not adjusted for aggravating or mitigating factors, the court shall enter findings and conclusions and cause a record of the proceedings to be transmitted to a three-judge panel for sentencing under AS

12.55.175

.

In making a determination under (a) of this section, the court may not refer a case to a three-judge panel based on the defendant’s potential for rehabilitation if the court finds that a factor in aggravation set out in AS

12.55.155(c)(2)

, (8), (10), (12), (15), (17), (18)(B), (20), (21), or (28) is present.

A court may not refer a case to a three-judge panel under (a) of this section if the defendant is being sentenced for a sexual felony under AS

12.55.125(i)

and the request for the referral is based solely on the claim that the defendant, either singly or in combination, has

prospects for rehabilitation that are less than extraordinary; or

a history free of unprosecuted, undocumented, or undetected sexual offenses.

A court may not refer a case to a three-judge panel under (a) of this section if the request for referral is based, in whole or in part, on the claim that a sentence within the presumptive range may result in the classification of the defendant as deportable under federal immigration law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 37 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 27 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 90 SLA 2003; am § 22 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 22 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

Sentences of imprisonment for felonies — AS

12.55.125

Factors in aggravation and mitigation — AS

12.55.155

Three-judge sentencing panel — AS

12.55.175

TD: VI, 77-78.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the enactment of (c) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 43, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For statement of legislative intent relating to (d) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 56, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (c).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(b), ch. 43, SLA 2013, subsection (c), added by sec. 22, ch. 43, SLA 2013, applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2013.

Under sec. 5, ch. 56, SLA 2014, subsection (d) applies “to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2014 if the sentence is imposed on or after July 1, 2014.”

Sec. 12.55.172.
[Renumbered as AS 12.55.180.]

Sec. 12.55.175.
Three-judge sentencing panel.

There is created within the superior court a panel of five superior court judges to be appointed by the chief justice in accordance with rules and for terms as may be prescribed by the supreme court. Three judges of the panel shall be designated by the chief justice as members. The remaining two judges shall be designated by the chief justice as first and second alternates to sit as members in the event of disqualification or disability in accordance with rules as may be prescribed by the supreme court.

Upon receipt of a record of proceedings under AS

12.55.165

, the three-judge panel shall consider all pertinent files, records, and transcripts, including the findings and conclusions of the judge who originally heard the matter. The panel may hear oral testimony to supplement the record before it. If the panel supplements the record, the panel shall permit the victim to testify before the panel. If the panel finds that manifest injustice would result from failure to consider relevant aggravating or mitigating factors not specifically included in AS

12.55.155

or from imposition of a sentence within the presumptive range, whether or not adjusted for aggravating or mitigating factors, it shall sentence the defendant in accordance with this section. If the panel does not find that manifest injustice would result, it shall remand the case to the sentencing court, with a written statement of its findings and conclusions, for sentencing under AS

12.55.125

.

The three-judge panel may in the interest of justice sentence the defendant to any definite term of imprisonment up to the maximum term provided for the offense or to any sentence authorized under AS

12.55.015

.

Sentencing of a defendant or remanding of a case under this section shall be by a majority of the three-judge panel.

If the three-judge panel determines under (b) of this section that manifest injustice would result from imposition of a sentence within the presumptive range and the panel also finds that the defendant has an exceptional potential for rehabilitation and that a sentence of less than the presumptive range should be imposed because of the defendant’s exceptional potential for rehabilitation, the panel

shall sentence the defendant within the presumptive range required under AS

12.55.125

or as permitted under AS

12.55.155

;

shall order the defendant under AS

12.55.015

to engage in appropriate programs of rehabilitation; and

may provide that the defendant is eligible for discretionary parole under AS

33.16.090

during the second half of the sentence imposed under this subsection if the defendant successfully completes all rehabilitation programs ordered under (2) of this subsection.

A defendant being sentenced for a sexual felony under AS

12.55.125(i)

may not establish, nor may the three-judge panel find under (b) of this section or any other provision of law, that manifest injustice would result from imposition of a sentence within the presumptive range based solely on the claim that the defendant, either singly or in combination, has

prospects for rehabilitation that are less than extraordinary; or

a history free of unprosecuted, undocumented, or undetected sexual offenses.

A defendant being sentenced under AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d), (e), or (i) may not establish, nor may a three-judge panel find under (b) of this section or any other provision of law, that manifest injustice would result from imposing a sentence within the presumptive range based, in whole or in part, on the claim that the sentence may result in the classification of the defendant as deportable under federal immigration law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 28 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 16 ch 63 SLA 1997; am §§ 23, 24 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 23 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

Sentences of imprisonment for felonies — AS

12.55.125

Extraordinary circumstances — AS

12.55.165

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: VI, 78-79.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the enactment of (f) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 43, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For statement of legislative intent relating to (g) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 56, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (f).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(b), ch. 43, SLA 2013, subsection (f), added by sec. 23, ch. 43, SLA 2013, applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2013.

Under sec. 5, ch. 56, SLA 2014, subsection (g) applies “to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2014 if the sentence is imposed on or after July 1, 2014.”

Sec. 12.55.180.
Designation of representative.

If more than one person who qualifies as a victim under AS

12.55.185

desires notice under AS

12.55.088

, the prosecuting attorney shall designate one person to represent all victims for purposes of receiving the notice required and exercising the rights granted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 59 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.55.185

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

12.55.172

. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 12.55.185.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“active term of imprisonment” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.127

;

“building” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“crime against a person” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

;

“criminal street gang” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“dangerous instrument” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“firearm” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“first felony conviction” means that the defendant has not been previously convicted of a felony;

“judicial officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.56.900

;

“most serious felony” means

arson in the first degree, sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

, enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(e)

, or any unclassified or class A felony prescribed under AS 11.41; or

an attempt, or conspiracy to commit, or criminal solicitation under AS

11.31.110

of, an unclassified felony prescribed under AS 11.41;

“paramedic” means a mobile intensive care paramedic licensed under AS 18.08;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“pecuniary gain” means the amount of money or value of property at the time of commission of the offense derived by the defendant from the commission of the offense, less the amount of money or value of property returned to the victim of the offense or seized by or surrendered to lawful authority before sentence is imposed;

“second felony conviction” means that the defendant previously has been convicted of a felony;

“serious physical injury” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“sexual felony” means sexual assault in the first degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree, sex trafficking in the first degree, sexual assault in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree under AS

11.41.438(c)

, unlawful exploitation of a minor, indecent viewing or production of a picture under AS

11.61.123(f)(1)

or (2), distribution of child pornography, sexual assault in the third degree, incest, indecent exposure in the first degree, possession of child pornography, enticement of a minor, and felony attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit those crimes;

“third felony conviction” means that the defendant has been at least twice previously convicted of a felony;

“unconditional discharge” means that a defendant is released from all disability arising under a sentence, including probation and parole;

“victim” means

a person against whom an offense has been perpetrated;

one of the following, not the perpetrator, if the person specified in (A) of this paragraph is a minor, incompetent, or incapacitated:

an individual living in a spousal relationship with the person specified in (A) of this paragraph; or

a parent, adult child, guardian, or custodian of the person;

one of the following, not the perpetrator, if the person specified in (A) of this paragraph is dead:

a person living in a spousal relationship with the deceased before the deceased died;

an adult child, parent, brother, sister, grandparent, or grandchild of the deceased; or

any other interested person, as may be designated by a person having authority in law to do so.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 55, § 9 (1984); am § 3 ch 154 SLA 1984; § 7 ch 59 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 64 SLA 1991; am § 8 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 6 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 7 SLA 1996; am § 10 ch 60 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 90 SLA 2003; am § 25 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 17 ch 53 SLA 2006; am § 21 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 24 ch 43 SLA 2013; am §§
78, 79 ch 4 FSSLA 2019; am § 7 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

Definitions — AS 11.56.990,

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “domestic violence” — AS

25.35.060

.

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor's notes. —

Renumbered in 1991, 1993, 1996, and 2001 to maintain defined terms in alphabetical order.
In 2005, paragraph (1) was enacted as paragraph (18) and renumbered in 2005, at which time former paragraphs (1)-(17) were renumbered as paragraphs (2)-(18) [now (3)-(19)]. In 2006, paragraph (2) was enacted as paragraph (19) and renumbered in 2006, at which time former paragraphs (2)-(18) were renumbered as paragraphs (3)-(19).

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (10)(A), substituted “sex trafficking” for “promoting prostitution”, and added “online enticement of a minor under AS

11.41.452(e)

,” following “AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

”.

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (16), inserted “sex trafficking in the first degree,” following “abuse of a minor in the first degree,”, and “online enticement of a minor,” following “possession of child pornography,”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (10)(A), deleted “online” following “AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

,” and in (16), inserted “sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree under AS

11.41.438(c)

,” and “indecent viewing or production of a picture under AS

11.61.123(f)(1)

or (2),” and deleted “online” following “possession of child pornography,”.

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (11), substituted “AS 18.08” for “AS 08.64”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to paragraph (10) apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Under sec. 46(b), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to paragraph (16) apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2013.

Section 142(b), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to paragraphs (10) and (16) of this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent relating to the definition of “victim” in this section, as amended by § 7,
ch. 59, SLA 1989 (CSHB 36(Fin) am), and related letter from the Department of Law, see 1989 House Journal 710 — 712.

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.